Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-2101 to 48-2117 shall be known and
may be cited as the Contractor Registration Act.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB162, § 1.